Utah statutes.
67-19-34.   Rulemaking power to executive director.

In accordance with this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the executive director shall make rules regulating:

(1)  disciplinary actions for employees subject to discipline under Section 67-19-37;

(2)  the testing of employees for the use of controlled substances or alcohol as provided in Section 67-19-36;

(3)  the confidentiality of drug testing and test results performed under Section 67-19-36 in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and

(4)  minimum blood levels of alcohol or drug content for work effectiveness of an employee.

